Georgia, session 2025_26, HB858.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act creating the State Court of Cobb County, approved March 26, 1964 (Ga. L. 1964,
p. 3211), as amended, particularly by an Act approved May 12, 2008 (Ga. L. 2008, p. 3723),
and an Act approved May 12, 2015 (Ga. L. 2015, p. 4059), is amended by revising paragraph
(1) of subsection (d) of Section 27 as follows:
"(d)(1) The solicitor-general shall have the authority to appoint two assistant solicitors
for each judge of Division I and Division II of the State Court of Cobb County and the
same number of additional assistant solicitors as the number of full-time magistrates of
the Magistrate Court of Cobb County, plus six additional assistant solicitors, one of
whom shall be the chief assistant solicitor, four of whom may be deputy assistant
solicitors, and one of whom may serve as an intake attorney at the Cobb County Adult
H. B. 858
- 1 -

LC 47 3612
Detention Center. Appointments of new assistant solicitor positions shall be effective
upon the appropriation of funds by the governing authority as requested by the solicitor
general. The compensation of such assistant solicitors shall be determined by the
solicitor general. The compensation of the chief assistant solicitor shall not be less than
$113,519.12 and shall not exceed $170,279.23, payable in biweekly installments from the
funds of Cobb County. The compensation of any deputy assistant solicitor shall not be
less than $97,449.06 and shall not exceed $146,173.03, payable in biweekly installments
from the funds of Cobb County. The compensation of the assistant solicitors I shall not
be less than $62,775.34 and shall not exceed $100,438.99, payable in biweekly
installments from the funds of Cobb County. The compensation of the assistant solicitors
II shall not be less than $69,845.77 and shall not exceed $111,752.34 and shall be paid
in the same manner as all other assistant solicitors. The compensation of the assistant
solicitors III shall not be less than $73,381.53 and shall not exceed $117,409.57 and shall
be paid in the same manner as all other assistant solicitors. The solicitor-general shall
prescribe the duties and assignments of said assistant solicitors and, while so employed,
they shall not engage in the private practice of law."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 858
- 2 -